California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The Medical Board of California shall also annually
 disseminate the informational and educational material it develops pursuant to subdivision (b) to each acute care hospital in the state. The board may disseminate the informational and educational material to each acute care hospital in the state via email.

(d) The department and boards may consult with other state agencies as necessary to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   (SB 1468)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Professional Reporting [800. - 809.9.]

800.

(a) The Medical Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Board of Psychology, the Dental Board of California, the Dental Hygiene Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Board of Registered Nursing, the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, the California State Board of Optometry, the Veterinary Medical Board, the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Physical Therapy Board of California, the California State Board of Pharmacy, the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board, the California Board of Occupational Therapy, the Acupuncture Board, and the Physician Assistant
 Board shall each separately create and maintain a central file of the names of all persons who hold a license, certificate, or similar authority from that board. Each central file shall be created and maintained to provide an individual historical record for each licensee with respect to the following information:

(1) Any conviction of a crime in this or any other state that constitutes unprofessional conduct pursuant to the reporting requirements of Section 803.

(2) Any judgment or settlement requiring the licensee or the licensee’s insurer to pay any amount of damages in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for any claim that injury or death was proximately caused by the licensee’s negligence,
 error, or omission in practice, or by rendering unauthorized professional services, pursuant to the reporting requirements of Section 801 or 802.

(3) Any public complaints for which provision is made pursuant to subdivision (b).

(4) Disciplinary information reported pursuant to Section 805, including any additional exculpatory or explanatory statements submitted by the licentiate pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 805. If a court finds, in a final judgment, that the peer review resulting in the 805 report was conducted in bad faith and the licensee who is the subject of the report notifies the board of that finding, the board shall include that finding in the central file. For purposes of this paragraph, “peer review” has the same meaning as
 defined in Section 805.

(5) Information reported pursuant to Section 805.01, including any explanatory or exculpatory information submitted by the licensee pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(b) (1) Each board shall prescribe and promulgate forms on which members of the public and other licensees or certificate holders may file written complaints to the board alleging any act of misconduct in, or connected with, the performance of professional services by the licensee.

(2) If a board, or division thereof, a committee, or a panel has failed to act upon a complaint or report within five years, or has found that the complaint or report is without merit, the central file shall be purged of
 information relating to the complaint or report.

(3) Notwithstanding this subdivision, the Board of Psychology, the Board of Behavioral Sciences, and the Respiratory Care Board of California shall maintain complaints or reports as long as each board deems necessary.

(c) (1) The contents of any central file that are not public records under any other provision of law shall be confidential except that the licensee involved, or the licensee’s counsel or representative, may inspect and have copies made of the licensee’s complete file except for the provision that may disclose the identity of an information source. For the purposes of this section, a board may protect an information source by providing a copy of the material with only those deletions necessary to
 protect the identity of the source or by providing a summary of the substance of the material. Whichever method is used, the board shall ensure that full disclosure is made to the subject of any personal information that could reasonably in any way reflect or convey anything detrimental, disparaging, or threatening to a licensee’s reputation, rights, benefits, privileges, or qualifications, or be used by a board to make a determination that would affect a licensee’s rights, benefits, privileges, or qualifications. The information required to be disclosed pursuant to Section 803.1 shall not be considered among the contents of a central file for the purposes of this subdivision.

(2) The licensee may, but is not required to, submit any additional exculpatory or explanatory statement or other information that the board shall include in the
 central file.

(3) Each board may permit any law enforcement or regulatory agency when required for an investigation of unlawful activity or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes to inspect and have copies made of that licensee’s file, unless the disclosure is otherwise prohibited by law.

(4) These disclosures shall effect no change in the confidential status of these records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 14.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

(a) Except as provided in Section 801.01 and subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section, every insurer providing professional liability insurance to a person who holds a license, certificate, or similar authority from or under any agency specified in subdivision (a) of Section 800 shall send a complete report to that agency as to any settlement or arbitration award over three thousand dollars ($3,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by his or her rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties.

(b) Every insurer providing professional liability insurance to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4990), or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) shall send a complete report to the Board of Behavioral Sciences as to any settlement or arbitration award over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by his or her rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties.

(c) Every insurer providing professional liability insurance to a dentist licensed pursuant to Chapter 4
 (commencing with Section 1600) shall send a complete report to the Dental Board of California as to any settlement or arbitration award over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties.

(d) Every insurer providing liability insurance to a veterinarian licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800) shall send a complete report to the Veterinary Medical Board of any settlement or arbitration award over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or
 rendering of unauthorized professional service. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties.

(e) Every insurer providing professional liability insurance to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) shall send a complete report to the Board of Registered Nursing as to any settlement or arbitration award over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by his or her rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties. 

(f) The insurer shall notify the claimant, or if the claimant is represented by counsel, the insurer shall notify the claimant’s attorney, that the report required by subdivision (a), (b), or (c) has been sent to the agency. If the attorney has not received this notice within 45 days after the settlement was reduced to writing and signed by all of the parties, the arbitration award was served on the parties, or the date of entry of the civil judgment, the attorney shall make the report to the agency.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no insurer shall enter into a settlement without the written consent of the insured, except that this prohibition shall not void any settlement entered into without that written consent. The requirement of written consent shall only be waived by both the insured and the insurer.

(h) For purposes of this section, “insurer” means the following:

(1) The insurer providing professional liability insurance to the licensee.

(2) The licensee, or his or her counsel, if the licensee does not possess professional liability insurance.

(3) A state or local governmental agency, including, but not limited to, a joint powers authority, that self-insures the licensee. As used in this paragraph, “state governmental agency” includes, but is not limited to, the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   (SB 799)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

801.01.

The Legislature finds and declares that the filing of reports with the applicable state agencies required under this section is essential for the protection of the public. It is the intent of the Legislature that the reporting requirements set forth in this section be interpreted broadly in order to expand reporting obligations.

(a) A complete report shall be sent to the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board with respect to a licensee of the board as to the following:

(1) A settlement over thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or arbitration award of any amount or a civil judgment of any amount, whether or not
 vacated by a settlement after entry of the judgment, that was not reversed on appeal, of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by the licensee’s alleged negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by the licensee’s rendering of unauthorized professional services.

(2) A settlement over thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), if the settlement is based on the licensee’s alleged negligence, error, or omission in practice, or on the licensee’s rendering of unauthorized professional services, and a party to the settlement is a corporation, medical group, partnership, or other corporate entity in which the licensee has an ownership interest or that employs or contracts with the licensee.

(b) The report shall be sent by any of the following:

(1) The insurer providing professional liability
 insurance to the licensee.

(2) The licensee, or the licensee’s counsel.

(3) A state or local governmental agency that self-insures the licensee. For purposes of this section, “state governmental agency” includes, but is not limited to, the University of California.

(c) The entity, person, or licensee obligated to report pursuant to subdivision (b) shall send the complete report if the judgment, settlement agreement, or arbitration award is entered against or paid by the employer of the licensee and not entered against or paid by the licensee. “Employer,” as used in this paragraph, means a professional corporation, a group practice, a health care facility or clinic licensed or exempt from licensure under the Health and Safety Code, a licensed health care service plan, a medical care foundation, an educational
 institution, a professional institution, a professional school or college, a general law corporation, a public entity, or a nonprofit organization that employs, retains, or contracts with a licensee referred to in this section. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize the employment of, or contracting with, any licensee in violation of Section 2400.

(d) The report shall be sent to the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board as appropriate, within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto, within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties, or within 30 days after the date of entry of the civil judgment.

(e) The entity, person, or licensee required to report under
 subdivision (b) shall notify the claimant or the claimant’s counsel, if the claimant is represented by counsel, that the report has been sent to the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board. If the claimant or the claimant’s counsel has not received this notice within 45 days after the settlement was reduced to writing and signed by all of the parties or the arbitration award was served on the parties or the date of entry of the civil judgment, the claimant or the claimant’s counsel shall make the report to the appropriate board.

(f) Failure to substantially comply with this section is a public offense punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(g) (1) The Medical Board of
 California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board may develop a prescribed form for the report.

(2) The report shall be deemed complete only if it includes the following information:

(A) The name and last known business and residential addresses of every plaintiff or claimant involved in the matter, whether or not the person received an award under the settlement, arbitration, or judgment.

(B) The name and last known business and residential addresses of every licensee who was alleged to have acted improperly, whether or not that person was a named defendant in the action and whether or not that person was required to pay any damages pursuant to the settlement, arbitration award, or judgment.

(C) The name, address, and principal place of business of every insurer providing professional liability insurance to any person described in subparagraph (B), and the insured’s policy number.

(D) The name of the court in which the action or any part of the action was filed, and the date of filing and case number of each action.

(E) A description or summary of the facts of each claim, charge, or allegation, including the date of occurrence and the licensee’s role in the care or professional services provided to the patient with respect to those services at issue in the claim or action.

(F) The name and last known business address of each attorney who represented a party in the settlement, arbitration, or civil action, including the name of the client the
 attorney represented.

(G) The amount of the judgment, the date of its entry, and a copy of the judgment; the amount of the arbitration award, the date of its service on the parties, and a copy of the award document; or the amount of the settlement and the date it was reduced to writing and signed by all parties and a copy of the settlement agreement. If an otherwise reportable settlement is entered into after a reportable judgment or arbitration award is issued, the report shall include both a copy of the settlement agreement and a copy of the judgment or award.

(H) The specialty or subspecialty of the licensee who was the subject of the claim or action.

(I) Any other information the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician
 Assistant Board may, by regulation, require.

(3) Every professional liability insurer, self-insured governmental agency, or licensee or the licensee’s counsel that makes a report under this section and has received a copy of any written or electronic patient medical or hospital records prepared by the treating physician and surgeon, podiatrist, or physician assistant, or the staff of the treating physician and surgeon, podiatrist, or hospital, describing the medical condition, history, care, or treatment of the person whose death or injury is the subject of the report, or a copy of any deposition in the matter that discusses the care, treatment, or medical condition of the person, shall include with the report, copies of the records and depositions, subject to reasonable costs to be paid by the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board.
 If confidentiality is required by court order and, as a result, the reporter is unable to provide the records and depositions, documentation to that effect shall accompany the original report. The applicable board may, upon prior notification of the parties to the action, petition the appropriate court for modification of any protective order to permit disclosure to the board. A professional liability insurer, self-insured governmental agency, or licensee or the licensee’s counsel shall maintain the records and depositions referred to in this paragraph for at least one year from the date of filing of the report required by this section.

(h) If the board, within 60 days of its receipt of a report filed under this section, notifies a person named in the report, that person shall maintain for the period of three years from the date of filing of the report any records that person has as to the matter in question and shall make those records
 available upon request to the board to which the report was sent.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no insurer shall enter into a settlement without the written consent of the insured, except that this prohibition shall not void any settlement entered into without that written consent. The requirement of written consent shall only be waived by both the insured and the insurer.

(j) (1) A state or local governmental agency that self-insures licensees shall, prior to sending a report pursuant to this section, do all of the following with respect to each licensee who will be identified in the report:

(A) Before deciding that a licensee will be identified, provide written notice to the licensee that the agency intends to submit a report in which the licensee may be identified, based on
 the licensee’s role in the care or professional services provided to the patient that were at issue in the claim or action. This notice shall describe the reasons for notifying the licensee. The agency shall include with this notice a reasonable opportunity for the licensee to review a copy of records to be used by the agency in deciding whether to identify the licensee in the report.

(B) Provide the licensee with a reasonable opportunity to provide a written response to the agency and written materials in support of the licensee’s position. If the licensee is identified in the report, the agency shall include this response and materials in the report submitted to a board under this section if requested by the licensee.

(C) At least 10 days prior to the expiration of the 30-day reporting requirement under subdivision (d), provide the licensee with the opportunity to present
 arguments to the body that will make the final decision or to that body’s designee. The body shall review the care or professional services provided to the patient with respect to those services at issue in the claim or action and determine the licensee or licensees to be identified in the report and the amount of the settlement to be apportioned to the licensee.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to modify either the content of a report required under this section or the timeframe for filing that report.

(k) For purposes of this section, “licensee” means a licensee of the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 2.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

801.1.

(a) Every state or local governmental agency that self-insures a person who holds a license, certificate, or similar authority from or under any agency specified in subdivision (a) of Section 800 (except a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or the Osteopathic Initiative Act) shall send a complete report to that agency as to any settlement or arbitration award over three thousand dollars ($3,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to
 writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties.

(b) Every state or local governmental agency that self-insures a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4990), or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) shall send a complete report to the Board of Behavioral Science Examiners as to any settlement or arbitration award over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by that person’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report shall be sent within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all parties thereto or within 30 days after service of the arbitration award on the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 7.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

(a) Every settlement, judgment, or arbitration award over three thousand dollars ($3,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by negligence, error or omission in practice, or by the unauthorized rendering of professional services, by a person who holds a license, certificate, or other similar authority from an agency specified in subdivision (a) of Section 800 (except a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or the Osteopathic Initiative Act) who does not possess professional liability insurance as to that claim shall, within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all the parties thereto or 30
 days after service of the judgment or arbitration award on the parties, be reported to the agency that issued the license, certificate, or similar authority. A complete report shall be made by appropriate means by the person or his or her counsel, with a copy of the communication to be sent to the claimant through his or her counsel if the person is so represented, or directly if he or she is not. If, within 45 days of the conclusion of the written settlement agreement or service of the judgment or arbitration award on the parties, counsel for the claimant (or if the claimant is not represented by counsel, the claimant himself or herself) has not received a copy of the report, he or she shall himself or herself make the complete report. Failure of the licensee or claimant (or, if represented by counsel, their counsel) to comply with this section is a public offense punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) or more than five hundred dollars ($500). Knowing and intentional failure to comply
 with this section or conspiracy or collusion not to comply with this section, or to hinder or impede any other person in the compliance, is a public offense punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(b) Every settlement, judgment, or arbitration award over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by negligence, error or omission in practice, or by the unauthorized rendering of professional services, by a marriage and family therapist, a clinical social worker, or a professional clinical counselor licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4990), or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10), respectively, who does not possess professional liability insurance as to that claim shall within 30 days after the written settlement agreement has been reduced to
 writing and signed by all the parties thereto or 30 days after service of the judgment or arbitration award on the parties be reported to the agency that issued the license, certificate, or similar authority. A complete report shall be made by appropriate means by the person or his or her counsel, with a copy of the communication to be sent to the claimant through his or her counsel if he or she is so represented, or directly if he or she is not. If, within 45 days of the conclusion of the written settlement agreement or service of the judgment or arbitration award on the parties, counsel for the claimant (or if he or she is not represented by counsel, the claimant himself or herself) has not received a copy of the report, he or she shall himself or herself make a complete report. Failure of the marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, or professional clinical counselor or claimant (or, if represented by counsel, his or her counsel) to comply with this section is a public offense punishable by
 a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Knowing and intentional failure to comply with this section, or conspiracy or collusion not to comply with this section or to hinder or impede any other person in that compliance, is a public offense punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 8.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

802.1.

(a) (1) A physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, a doctor of podiatric medicine, and a physician assistant shall report either of the following to the entity that issued his or her license:

(A) The bringing of an indictment or information charging a felony against the licensee.

(B) The conviction of the licensee, including any verdict of guilty, or plea of guilty or no contest, of any felony or misdemeanor.

(2) The report required by this subdivision shall be made in writing within 30 days of the date of the
 bringing of the indictment or information or of the conviction.

(b) Failure to make a report required by this section shall be a public offense punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 3.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

802.5.

(a) When a coroner receives information that is based on findings that were reached by, or documented and approved by a board-certified or board-eligible pathologist indicating that a death may be the result of a physician and surgeon’s, podiatrist’s, or physician assistant’s gross negligence or incompetence, a report shall be filed with the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board. The initial report shall include the name of the decedent, date and place of death, attending physicians or podiatrists, and all other relevant information available. The initial report shall be followed, within 90 days, by copies of the coroner’s report,
 autopsy protocol, and all other relevant information.

(b) The report required by this section shall be confidential. No coroner, physician and surgeon, or medical examiner, nor any authorized agent, shall be liable for damages in any civil action as a result of his or her acting in compliance with this section. No board-certified or board-eligible pathologist, nor any authorized agent, shall be liable for damages in any civil action as a result of his or her providing information under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 4.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), within 10 days after a judgment by a court of this state that a person who holds a license, certificate, or other similar authority from the Board of Behavioral Sciences or from an agency mentioned in subdivision (a) of Section 800 (except a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200)) has committed a crime, or is liable for any death or personal injury resulting in a judgment for an amount in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) caused by his or her negligence, error or omission in practice, or his or her rendering unauthorized professional services, the clerk of the court that rendered the judgment shall report that fact to the agency that issued the license, certificate, or other similar authority.

(b) For purposes of a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, doctor of podiatric medicine, or physician assistant, who is liable for any death or personal injury resulting in a judgment of any amount caused by his or her negligence, error or omission in practice, or his or her rendering unauthorized professional services, the clerk of the court that rendered the judgment shall report that fact to the agency that issued the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 5.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

803.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall disclose to an inquiring member of the public information regarding any enforcement actions taken against a licensee, including a former licensee, by the board or by another state or jurisdiction, including all of the following:

(1) Temporary restraining orders issued.

(2) Interim suspension orders issued.

(3) Revocations, suspensions, probations, or limitations on practice
 ordered by the board, including those made part of a probationary order or stipulated agreement.

(4) Public letters of reprimand issued.

(5) Infractions, citations, or fines imposed.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in addition to the information provided in subdivision (a), the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall disclose to an inquiring member of the public all of the following:

(1) Civil judgments in any amount, whether or not vacated by a settlement after entry of the judgment, that were not reversed on appeal and arbitration awards in any
 amount of a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by the licensee’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by rendering unauthorized professional services.

(2) (A) All settlements in the possession, custody, or control of the board shall be disclosed for a licensee in the low-risk category if there are three or more settlements for that licensee within the last 10 years, except for settlements by a licensee regardless of the amount paid where (i) the settlement is made as a part of the settlement of a class claim, (ii) the licensee paid in settlement of the class claim the same amount as the other licensees in the same class or similarly situated licensees in the same class, and (iii) the settlement was paid in the context of a case where the complaint that alleged class liability on
 behalf of the licensee also alleged a products liability class action cause of action. All settlements in the possession, custody, or control of the board shall be disclosed for a licensee in the high-risk category if there are four or more settlements for that licensee within the last 10 years except for settlements by a licensee regardless of the amount paid where (i) the settlement is made as a part of the settlement of a class claim, (ii) the licensee paid in settlement of the class claim the same amount as the other licensees in the same class or similarly situated licensees in the same class, and (iii) the settlement was paid in the context of a case where the complaint that alleged class liability on behalf of the licensee also alleged a products liability class action cause of action. Classification of a licensee in either a “high-risk category” or a “low-risk category” depends upon the
 specialty or subspecialty practiced by the licensee and the designation assigned to that specialty or subspecialty by the Medical Board of California, as described in subdivision (f). For the purposes of this paragraph, “settlement” means a settlement of an action described in paragraph (1) entered into by the licensee on or after January 1, 2003, in an amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more.

(B) The board shall not disclose the actual dollar amount of a settlement but shall put the number and amount of the settlement in context by doing the following:

(i) Comparing the settlement amount to the experience of other licensees within the same specialty or subspecialty, indicating if it is below average, average, or above average for the most recent 10-year period.

(ii) Reporting the number of years the licensee has been in practice.

(iii) Reporting the total number of licensees in that specialty or subspecialty, the number of those who have entered into a settlement agreement, and the percentage that number represents of the total number of licensees in the specialty or subspecialty.

(3) Current American Board of Medical Specialties certification or board equivalent as certified by the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine.

(4) Approved postgraduate training.

(5) Status of
 the license of a licensee. By January 1, 2004, the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall adopt regulations defining the status of a licensee. The board shall employ this definition when disclosing the status of a licensee pursuant to Section 2027.

(6) Any summaries of hospital disciplinary actions that result in the termination or revocation of a licensee’s staff privileges for medical disciplinary cause or reason, unless a court finds, in a final judgment, that the peer review resulting in the disciplinary action was conducted in bad faith and the licensee notifies the board of that finding. In addition, any exculpatory or explanatory statements submitted by the licentiate electronically pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 805 shall be disclosed. For
 purposes of this paragraph, “peer review” has the same meaning as defined in Section 805.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall disclose to an inquiring member of the public information received regarding felony convictions of a licensee.

(d) The Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board may formulate appropriate disclaimers or explanatory statements to be included with any information released, and may by regulation establish categories of information that need not be disclosed to an inquiring member of
 the public because that information is unreliable or not sufficiently related to the licensee’s professional practice. The Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall include the following statement when disclosing information concerning a settlement:

“Some studies have shown that there is no significant correlation between malpractice history and a licensee’s competence. At the same time, the State of California believes that consumers should have access to malpractice information. In these profiles, the State of California has given you information about both the malpractice settlement history for the licensee’s specialty and the licensee’s history of settlement payments only if in
 the last 10 years, the licensee, if in a low-risk specialty, has three or more settlements or the licensee, if in a high-risk specialty, has four or more settlements. The State of California has excluded some class action lawsuits because those cases are commonly related to systems issues such as product liability, rather than questions of individual professional competence and because they are brought on a class basis where the economic incentive for settlement is great. The State of California has placed payment amounts into three statistical categories: below average, average, and above average compared to others in the licensee’s specialty. To make the best health care decisions, you should view this information in perspective. You could miss an opportunity for high-quality care by selecting a licensee based solely on malpractice history.

When considering
 malpractice data, please keep in mind:

Malpractice histories tend to vary by specialty. Some specialties are more likely than others to be the subject of litigation. This report compares licensees only to the members of their specialty, not to all licensees, in order to make an individual licensee’s history more meaningful.
